Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Clean Energy and Community Flood Preparedness Act.

§ 10.1-1329.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Allowance”
means an authorization to emit a fixed amount of carbon dioxide.

“Allowance auction”
means an auction in which the Department or its agent offers allowances for sale.

“DHCD”
means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

“DOE”
means the Department of Energy.

“Energy efficiency program”
has the same meaning as provided in § 56-576.

“Fund”
means the Virginia Community Flood Preparedness Fund created pursuant to §

10.1-603.25

.

“Housing development”
means the same as that term is defined in §

36-141

.

“Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative”
or

“RGGI”

means the program to implement the memorandum of understanding between signatory states dated December 20, 2005, and as may be amended, and the corresponding model rule that established a regional carbon dioxide electric power sector cap and trade program.

“Secretary”
means the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources.

History.

2020, cc. 1219, 1280; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 401, 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1291 and 1280, cl. 2 provides: “That the costs of allowances purchased through a market-based trading program consistent with the provisions of Article 4 (§

10.1-1329

et seq.) of Chapter 13 of Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia as added by this act are deemed to constitute environmental compliance project costs that may be recovered by a Phase I Utility or Phase II Utility, as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, pursuant to subdivision A 5 e of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 401, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and Historic” in the definition for “Secretary.”

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “‘DOE’ means the Department of Energy” for “‘DMME’ means the Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy.”

§ 10.1-1330.
Clean Energy and Community Flood Preparedness.

The provisions of this article shall be incorporated by the Department, without further action by the Board, into the final regulation adopted by the Board on April 19, 2019, and published in the Virginia Register on May 27, 2019. Such incorporation by the Department shall be exempt from the provisions of the Virginia Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

The Director is hereby authorized to establish, implement, and manage an auction program to sell allowances into a market-based trading program consistent with the RGGI program and this article. The Director shall seek to sell 100 percent of all allowances issued each year through the allowance auction, unless the Department finds that doing so will have a negative impact on the value of allowances and result in a net loss of consumer benefit or is otherwise inconsistent with the RGGI program.

To the extent permitted by Article X, Section 7 of the Constitution of Virginia, the state treasury shall (i) hold the proceeds recovered from the allowance auction in an interest-bearing account with all interest directed to the account to carry out the purposes of this article and (ii) use the proceeds without further appropriation for the following purposes:

Forty-five percent of the revenue shall be credited to the account established pursuant to the Fund for the purpose of assisting localities and their residents affected by recurrent flooding, sea level rise, and flooding from severe weather events.

Fifty percent of the revenue shall be credited to an account administered by DHCD to support low-income energy efficiency programs, including programs for eligible housing developments. DHCD shall review and approve funding proposals for such energy efficiency programs, and DOE shall provide technical assistance upon request. Any sums remaining within the account administered by DHCD, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in such account to support low-income energy efficiency programs.

Three percent of the revenue shall be used to (i) cover reasonable administrative expenses of the Department in the administration of the revenue allocation, carbon dioxide emissions cap and trade program, and auction and (ii) carry out statewide climate change planning and mitigation activities.

Two percent of the revenue shall be used by DHCD, in partnership with DOE, to administer and implement low-income energy efficiency programs pursuant to subdivision 2.

The Department, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, DHCD, and DOE shall prepare a joint annual written report describing the Commonwealth’s participation in RGGI, the annual reduction in greenhouse gas emissions, the revenues collected and deposited in the interest-bearing account maintained by the Department pursuant to this article, and a description of each way in which money was expended during the fiscal year. The report shall be submitted to the Governor and General Assembly by January 1, 2022, and annually thereafter.

History.

2020, cc. 1219, 1280; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, substituted “DOE” for “DMME” in subdivisions C 2 and 4 and subsection D.

§ 10.1-1331.
Energy conversion or energy tolling agreements.

If the Governor seeks to include the Commonwealth as a full participant in RGGI or another carbon trading program with an open auction of allowances, or if the Department implements the final carbon trading regulation as approved by the Board on April 19, 2019, (the Final Regulation) in order to establish a carbon dioxide cap and trade program that limits and reduces the total carbon dioxide emissions released by certain electric generation facilities and that complies with the RGGI model rule, then (i) the definition of the term “life-of-the-unit contractual arrangement” under the Final Regulation shall include any energy conversion or energy tolling agreement that has a primary term of 20 years or more and pursuant to which the purchaser is required to deliver fuel to the CO2 budget source or CO2 budget unit and is entitled to receive all of the nameplate capacity and associated energy generated by such source or unit for the entire contractual period and (ii) any purchaser under an energy conversion or energy tolling agreement shall be responsible for acquiring any CO2 allowances required under the Final Regulation in relation to a CO2 budget source or CO2 budget unit that is subject to such agreement.

History.

2020, cc. 1219, 1280.